Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2031
Osteopathic physician; license; requirements.

Every applicant for a license to practice as an osteopathic physician shall (1) present proof of having completed a four-year course in an accredited high school or its equivalent, (2) present proof of having graduated from an accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine, and (3) pass an examination, as approved by the board, in the science of osteopathy and the practice of the same.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 117, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 71-1703;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,139;

Laws 1981, LB 451, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 443;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 159;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 104;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,139;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 689.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.